Tennessee, session 114, HB1889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 35, is amended by
adding the following as new sections:
49-6-3513.
(a)
(1) In compliance with all state and federal student privacy laws, the
program is subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's
designee. The audit may include a sample of scholarships to evaluate the
eligibility of the participating students, the funds deposited in the scholarship
accounts, and whether scholarship funds are being used for authorized
expenditures. The audit may also include an analysis of the department's
program monitoring process and the sufficiency of the department's fraud
protection measures. The department shall cooperate fully with the comptroller
of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in the performance of the audit. The
audit must be made available to the members of the general assembly.
(2) A private school that enrolls recipients is subject to audit by the
comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. A private school shall
pay for the cost of the audit and cooperate fully with the comptroller of the
treasury or the comptroller's designee in the performance of an audit conducted
HB1889
011277
- 1 -

pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2). The audit must be made available to the
members of the general assembly and to the public on the comptroller's website.
(b) A private school that enrolls recipients shall:
(1) Voluntarily comply with the open meetings laws, compiled in title 8,
chapter 44, part 1, and open records laws, compiled in title 10, chapter 7;
(2) Provide a written report to the parent or legal guardian of a recipient
of the recipient's educational progress at least twice each school year;
(3) Not increase tuition for a recipient by more than ten percent (10%) as
compared to the tuition charged to the recipient by the private school in the
immediately preceding school year;
(4) Annually disclose the admissions criteria, tuition rates, and
demographics of the school on the school's website;
(5) Annually disclose the admittance rate for the school for the respective
school year; and
(6) Publish the outcomes of the tests administered to recipients pursuant
to § 49-6-3507 on the school's website.
(c) The department shall require an eligible student to disclose the name of the
school in which the eligible student was enrolled in the immediately preceding school
year on the scholarship application in order to receive a scholarship.
49-6-3514.
(a)
(1) The department shall prepare an annual report for the program that:
(A) Identifies each private school that enrolls recipients in the
current school year;
- 2 - 011277

(B) Includes the number of recipients enrolled at each private
school in the current school year;
(C) Includes the outcomes of the tests administered to recipients
pursuant to § 49-6-3507;
(D) Identifies the county of residences for each parent or guardian
who applied for a scholarship and whose student received a scholarship
in the current school year;
(E) Identifies the amount of scholarship funds each recipient
spent in the immediately preceding school year and identify the types of
allowable expenditures for which those funds were used by a recipient;
(F) Reports the number of known violations of this part; and
(G) Includes the annual reports submitted by each private school
pursuant to subsection (b) for the immediately preceding school year.
(2) The department shall submit the report to the general assembly and
publish the report on the department's website by October 1 of each year.
(b) Each private school that enrolls recipients shall:
(1) Contract with a certified public accountant for the certified public
accountant to prepare an audit of the private school for each school year for
which the school enrolls recipients. The audit must examine and report:
(A) The total amount of scholarship funds received by the school
from enrolled recipients;
(B) All expenditures made by the school that exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000); and
(C) The name, title, and salary of each of the five (5) highest-paid
employees of the school; and
- 3 - 011277

(2) Submit the audit prepared pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) to the
department by August 1 of each year.
49-6-3515.
The comptroller of the treasury shall evaluate the program and submit a report to
the general assembly by December 31, 2029, that includes the following information for
the program based on data from the entirety of the program's existence for:
(1) The educational outcomes of recipients;
(2) The cost of administering the program; and
(3) The effect of the program on LEAs, if any.
49-6-3516.
This part is repealed on July 1, 2030.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3504, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (c)(4) and (c)(5) and adding the following as a new subdivision (d)(4):
(4) Be a member of a household with an annual household income for the
previous year that does not exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the amount
required for the student to qualify for free or reduced-price lunch, as provided in the
income eligibility guidelines published by the United States department of agriculture's
food and nutrition service.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3507(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) As a condition of receiving a scholarship pursuant to this part, a recipient
must be annually administered the same Tennessee comprehensive assessment
program (TCAP) tests, or successor tests authorized by the state board of education,
administered to a public school student who is enrolled in the same grade or in the same
course subject as the recipient.
- 4 - 011277

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3507(a)(2), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
A test administered to comply with subdivision (a)(1) must be uniformly
administered to all recipients in the same grade level at the private school unless
the recipient has an accommodation under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.), or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act
(29 U.S.C. § 794).
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3508, is amended by deleting
subsection (b).
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5101(a), is amended by adding
"and recipients, as defined in § 49-6-3502," after "all students" and adding "or the education
freedom scholarship program" after "Tennessee public school".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5101(c), is amended by adding
"and private school that enrolls recipients as defined in § 49-6-3502" after "each LEA" wherever
it appears in the subsection.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011277